Illinois, session 104th, HB4574.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. References to Act. This Act may be referred to 5as the Public Office Eligibility and Criminal Conviction 6Clarification Act. 7    (60 ILCS 1/55-6 rep.)8    Section 5. The Township Code is amended by repealing 9Section 55-6. 10    Section 10. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 11changing Sections 3.1-10-5 and 6-3-9 as follows: 12    (65 ILCS 5/3.1-10-5)  (from Ch. 24, par. 3.1-10-5)13    Sec. 3.1-10-5. Qualifications; elective office. 14    (a) A person is not eligible for an elective municipal 15office unless that person is a qualified elector of the 16municipality and has resided in the municipality at least one 17year next preceding the election or appointment, except as 18provided in Section 3.1-20-25, subsection (b) of Section 193.1-25-75, Section 5-2-2, or Section 5-2-11.20    (b) A person is not eligible to take the oath of office for 21a municipal office if that person is, at the time required for   HB4574- 2 -LRB104 19027 WRO 32472 b1taking the oath of office, in arrears in the payment of a tax 2or other indebtedness due to the municipality. or has been 3convicted in any court located in the United States of any 4infamous crime, bribery, perjury, or other felony, unless such 5person is again restored to his or her rights of citizenship 6that may have been forfeited under Illinois law as a result of 7a conviction, which includes eligibility to hold elected 8municipal office, by the terms of a pardon for the offense, has 9received a restoration of rights by the Governor, or otherwise 10according to law. Any time after a judgment of conviction is 11rendered, a person convicted of an infamous crime, bribery, 12perjury, or other felony may petition the Governor for a 13restoration of rights.14    The changes made to this subsection by this amendatory Act 15of the 102nd General Assembly are declarative of existing law 16and apply to all persons elected at the April 4, 2017 17consolidated election and to persons elected or appointed 18thereafter.19    (b-5) (Blank). 20    (c) A person is not eligible for the office of alderperson 21of a ward unless that person has resided in the ward that the 22person seeks to represent, and a person is not eligible for the 23office of trustee of a district unless that person has resided 24in the municipality, at least one year next preceding the 25election or appointment, except as provided in Section 263.1-20-25, subsection (b) of Section 3.1-25-75, Section 5-2-2,   HB4574- 3 -LRB104 19027 WRO 32472 b1or Section 5-2-11.2    (d) If a person (i) is a resident of a municipality 3immediately prior to the active duty military service of that 4person or that person's spouse, (ii) resides anywhere outside 5of the municipality during that active duty military service, 6and (iii) immediately upon completion of that active duty 7military service is again a resident of the municipality, then 8the time during which the person resides outside the 9municipality during the active duty military service is deemed 10to be time during which the person is a resident of the 11municipality for purposes of determining the residency 12requirement under subsection (a). 13(Source: P.A. 102-15, eff. 6-17-21.) 14    (65 ILCS 5/6-3-9)  (from Ch. 24, par. 6-3-9)15    Sec. 6-3-9. Qualifications of mayor, city clerk, city 16treasurer and alderpersons - eligibility for other office. No 17person shall be eligible to the office of mayor, city clerk, 18city treasurer or alderperson:19        (1) Unless he is a qualified elector of the 20    municipality and has resided therein at least one year 21    next preceding his election or appointment; or22        (2) Unless, in the case of alderpersons, he resides 23    within the ward for which he is elected; or24        (3) If he is in arrears in the payment of any tax or 25    other indebtedness due to the city. ; or  HB4574- 4 -LRB104 19027 WRO 32472 b1        (4) If he has been convicted in Illinois state courts 2    or in courts of the United States of malfeasance in 3    office, bribery, or other infamous crime.4    No alderperson shall be eligible to any office, except 5that of acting mayor or mayor pro tem, the salary of which is 6payable out of the city treasury, if at the time of his 7appointment he is a member of the city council.8(Source: P.A. 102-15, eff. 6-17-21.)